Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.020

Designation of judge—Number of sessions.

In counties having more than one judge of the superior court the judges of such court shall annually, in the month of January, designate one or more of their number to hear all cases under this chapter. The judge or judges so designated shall hold as many sessions of the family court in each week as are necessary for the prompt disposition of matters before the court.

[ 1949 c 50 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 997-31.]